Utah statutes.
75-2a-118.   Illegal destruction or falsification of health care directive.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person:

(a)  willfully conceals, cancels, defaces, obliterates, or damages a health care directive of another without the declarant's consent; or

(b)  falsifies, forges, or alters a health care directive or a revocation of the health care directive of another person.

(2)  A person is guilty of criminal homicide if:

(a)  the person:

(i)  falsifies or forges the health care directive of an adult; or

(ii)  willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of:

(A)  the existence of a health care directive;

(B)  the revocation of a health care directive; or

(C) the disqualification of a surrogate; and

(b)  the actions described in Subsection (2)(a) cause a withholding or withdrawal of life sustaining procedures contrary to the wishes of a declarant resulting in the death of the declarant.

